Massachusetts, session 194th, H4671.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1Q of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “System”, in line 10, the following words:- or
other assessment or equivalent alternative that the board shall establish.
of 1